California, session 20252026 Special Session 1, AB4.
do enact as follows: SECTION 1. Section 39.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: SEC. 39.00. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the following bills are other bills providing for appropriations related to the Budget Bill within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution: AB 153, AB 155, AB 156, AB 159, AB 160, AB 161, AB 162, AB 163, AB 164, AB 165, AB 166, AB 167, AB 168, AB 169, AB 170, AB 171, AB 172, AB 173, AB 174, AB 175, AB 176, AB 177, AB 178, AB 179, AB 181, AB 182, AB 183, AB 184, AB 185, AB 218, SB 153, SB 155, SB 156, SB 159, SB 160, SB 161, SB 162, SB 163, SB 164, SB 165, SB 166, SB 167, SB 168, SB 169, SB 170, SB 171, SB 172, SB 173, SB 174, SB 175, SB 176, SB 177, SB 178, SB 179, SB 181, SB 182, SB 183, SB 184, SB 185, and SB 218 of the 2023–24 Regular Session, and AB 6, AB 7, SB 5, and SB 6 of the 2025–26 First Extraordinary Session. SEC. 2. Section 90.00 is added to the Budget Act of 2024, to read: SEC. 90.00. (a) For the purposes described in subdivision (b), the Director of Finance may augment the appropriation for any department or agency appropriation from any available source of funding, including, but not limited to, the General Fund. Augmentations pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed a total of $1,500,000,000. (b) Augmentations pursuant to subdivision (a) are hereby appropriated for use by state departments and entities for uses consistent with the purposes of the Disaster Response-Emergency Operations Account concerning areas of the state affected by wildfire states of emergency that were declared by the Governor in January 2025. Those uses include, but are not limited to, emergency protective measures, evacuations, sheltering for survivors, household hazardous waste removal, assessment and remediation of post-fire hazards such as flash flooding and debris flows, traffic control, air quality and water and other environmental testing, and other actions to protect health, protect the safety of persons or property, and expedite recovery. (c) Increases in augmentation authority pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be made sooner than three days following the transmittal of the approval to the chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee or an earlier date as determined by the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, except that, for the first $1,000,000,000 of augmentation authority pursuant to subdivision (a), the augmentations may be implemented in full immediately with no delay upon such a notification to the chairperson. (d) This section does not change, alter, limit, or constrain the emergency powers of the Governor and the executive branch in state law, including, but not limited to, the Governor’s fiscal authority related to emergencies. (e) Funds appropriated pursuant to this section shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until the applicable declarations of states of emergency in January 2025 are terminated or an alternate date as determined by the Director of Finance. SEC. 3. Section 99.50 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: INDEX FOR CONTROL SECTIONS SEC. 99.50. The following is an index to the general sections of this act. These sections serve to define terms and identify restrictions concerning the appropriations contained in this act. 1.00 Budget Act Citation 1.50 Intent and Format 1.51 Citations to Prior Budget Acts 1.80 Availability of Appropriations 2.00 Items of Appropriation 3.00 Defines Purposes of Appropriations 3.10 Subschedule Transfers for Capital Projects 3.50 Benefit Charges Against Salaries and Wages 3.60 Contribution to Public Employees’ Retirement Benefits 3.61 Contribution to Prefund Other Postemployment Benefits 4.05 Budget Adjustment Authority 4.11 Position Vacancy Report 4.12 Vacant Position Savings 4.13 AB 85 Repayments to Counties 4.20 Contribution to Public Employees’ Contingency Reserve  Fund 4.30 Lease-Revenue Payment Adjustments 4.72 Electric Vehicle Charging Infrastructure 4.75 Statewide Surcharge 4.80 State Public Works Board Interim Financing 4.90 Architectural Revolving Fund Transfer 4.95 Inmate and Ward Construction Revolving Account Transfer 5.25 Attorney’s Fees 5.26 Legal Services Grant Funding 6.00 Project Alterations Limits 8.00 Antiterrorism Federal Reimbursements 8.50 Federal Funds Receipts 8.51 Federal Funds Accounts 8.52 Federal Reimbursements 8.53 Notice of Federal Audits 8.54 Enforce Recovery of Federal Funds for Statewide Indirect  Costs 8.75 Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act 9.30 Federal Levy of State Funds 9.50 Minor Capital Outlay Projects 11.00 Information Technology Reporting Requirements 11.10 Reporting of Statewide Software License Agreements 11.11 Privacy of Information in Pay Stubs 11.93 Disaster Response-Emergency Operations Account  Reconciliation Adjustments 11.95 Federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 Home and  Community-Based Services Funding 11.96 Coronavirus Fiscal Relief 11.97 State Appropriation Limit Excludable Federal Fund  Appropriations for Capital Outlay 12.00 State Appropriations Limit (SAL) 12.30 Special Fund for Economic Uncertainties 12.32 Proposition 98-Funding Guarantee 12.35 Financial Aid Policy Change Requirements 12.45 June to July Payroll Deferral 13.00 Legislative Counsel Bureau 13.40 Budgetary Loan Borrowing from Special Funds 14.00 Special Fund Loans Between Boards of the Department of  Consumer Affairs 15.14 Allocation of Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund 15.25 Data Center Rate Adjustment 15.45 Trial Court Funding Offsets 15.80 Reparations Legislation Funding 20.00 Reappropriations and Reversions 24.00 State School Fund Allocations 24.03 Reading Control 24.30 Transfer School Building Rental Income to the General  Fund 24.60 Report of Lottery Funds Received 24.70 Local Educational Agency Fiscal Accountability 25.40 Contracted Fiscal Services Costs 25.50 SCO Apportionment Payment System Assessments 26.00 Intraschedule Transfers 28.00 Program Change Notification 28.50 Agency Reimbursement Payments 29.00 Position Estimates of Governor’s Budget, May Revision,  and Final Change Book 30.00 Continuous Appropriations 31.00 Budget Act Administrative Procedures for Salaries and  Wages 32.00 Prohibits Excess Expenditures 33.00 Item Veto Severability 34.00 Constitutional Severability 35.21 Application of Net Final Payment Accrual Methodology 35.35 FI$Cal—​Short-Term Cash Loans 35.50 Estimated General Fund Revenues and Various Estimates  Related to the Budget Stabilization Account 38.00 Provides That This Bill Is a Budget Bill 39.00 Identification of Bills Related to the Budget Bill 90.00 Funding for Fire Response and Recovery 90.01 Additional Funding for Fire Response and Recovery 99.00 Alphabetical Organization Index 99.50 Numerical Control Section Index SEC. 4. This act is a Budget Bill within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall take effect immediately.